Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2724
Probate record; retention.

The probate record shall be permanently retained on microfilm or in its original form in accordance with the Records Management Act. Evidence shall be retained as required by the Supreme Court.

G.S.1873, c. 14, § 32, p. 270;

Laws 1895, c. 31, § 1, p. 156;

Laws 1909, c. 41, § 1, p. 228;

R.S.1913, § 1233;

C.S.1922, § 1156;

C.S.1929, § 27-535;

R.S.1943, § 24-536;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 55;

Laws 1989, LB 229, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1989, § 24-555.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.